Louisiana, session 2026, HB399.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:833.2(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§833.2. Temporary release of inmate for limited purposes
A. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the secretary
may authorize the temporary release of any inmate, except an inmate sentenced to
death, for palliative or medical care when an inmate is diagnosed with a terminal
illness, and death is expected within sixty one hundred twenty days or when an
inmate is to be confined to an acute care hospital or nursing home with a condition
that totally prevents mobility, including but not limited to prolonged coma or
mechanical ventilation.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.